Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-307
Voter registration site; acts prohibited; registration procedure.

No materials advocating or advertising any political issue, candidate, or party shall be displayed or distributed within fifty feet of any voter registration site. No alcohol shall be served within fifty feet of any voter registration site. The registration procedure shall be conducted in a neutral manner and shall not be connected with anything unrelated to the object of registering electors except as otherwise provided in sections 32-308 and 32-310.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 69;

Laws 2025, LB521, § 26.